src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Berlīn:Berlīn PROP_KULTŪR  "Berliini" ;
Dēvit% jǭrad:Dēvit% jǭra PROP_JǬRA-PL  "Dieviņi-järvet" ;
Dīʼeviņjǭra:Dīʼeviņ#jǭra PROP_JǬRA  "Dieviņi-järvet" ;
Dēvit% jǭrad:Dēvit% jǭra PROP_JǬRA-PL  "Dieviņi-järvet" ;
Eirop:Eirop PROP_VȮŅ  "Eurooppa" ;
Ēstimǭ:Ēsti#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Viro" ;
Frantsij:Frantsij PROP_KǬJ  "Ranska" ;
Helsinki:Helsinki PROP_TORĪ  "Helsinki" ;
Holand:Holand PROP_VȮŅ  "Hollanti" ;
Ikškilā:Ikš#kilā PROP_PADĀ  "Ikšķile" ;
Īra:Īra PROP_JǬRA  "Lielirbe" ;
Īra% joʼug:Īra% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Irbe-joki" ;
Irē:Irē PROP_KALĀ-SG  "Mazirbe" ;
Irē% joʼug:Irē% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Mazirbe-joki" ;
Īrõmǭ:Īrõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Irlanti" ;
Island:Island PROP_VȮŅ  "Islanti" ;
Iʼzrael:Iʼzrael PROP_VAʼIT  "Israel" ;
Jeimeʼr:Jei#meʼr PROP_MEʼR  "Pohjoinen jäämeri" ;
Joʼugštūrga:Joʼugšt#ūrga PROP_ŪŠKA  "Jougstu-puro" ;
Kanād:Kanād PROP_VȮŅ  "Kanada" ;
Karnõdmäʼg:Karnõd#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Vārnu-kukkula" ;
Kēņigtarā% ūrga:Kēņigtarā% ūrga PROP_ŪŠKA  "Kēniņdārza-puro" ;
Kikkõnmäʼg:Kikkõn#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Ķikane-kukkula" ;
Kīlmaūrga:Kīlma#ūrga PROP_ŪŠKA  "Kīlmiņu-puro" ;
Kīʼnõ:Kīʼnõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ  "Kihnu" ;
Krīʼevmǭ:Krīʼev#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Venäjä" ;
Kūolka% kõlā:Kūolka% kõlā PROP_PADĀ  "Kolkanlahti" ;
Kūolka% nanā:Kūolka% nanā PROP_KALĀ  "Kolkanniemi" ;
Kuʼrmǭ:Kuʼr#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Kuurinmaa" ;
Laʼdgal:Laʼdgal PROP_AMĀT  "Latgale" ;
Līepõ:Līepõ PROP_SIELDÕ  "Liepāja" ;
Luksemburg:Luksemburg PROP_VȮŅ  "Luxemburg" ;
Lūʼž% joʼug:Lūʼž% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Lūžņa-joki" ;
Mustānum:Mustā#num PROP_KIM-SG  "Melnsils" ;
Nabāl% jǭra:Nabāl% jǭra PROP_JǬRA  "Nābeļa-järvi" ;
Nabālūrga:Nabāl#ūrga PROP_ĀITA  "Nabeļvalks-puro" ;
Nõʼvkilā:Nõʼv#kilā PROP_PADĀ  "Neveja" ;
Ōstūrga:Ōst#ūrga PROP_ĀITA  "Aizklāņu-puro" ;
Pēmpõd:Pēmpõd PROP_KAND  "Pempi-suo" ;
Pētõr% jǭrad:Pētõr% jǭrad PROP_JǬRA-PL  "Pēterezeri-järvet" ;
Pitrõg% joʼug:Pitrõg% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Pitraga-joki" ;
Pūoip:Pūoip PROP_IRM  "Pope" ;
Pūʼojmeʼr:Pūʼoj#meʼr PROP_MEʼR  "Pohjanmeri" ;
Pūoļmǭ:Pūoļ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Puola" ;
Puʼzzõ:Puʼzzõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ  "Puze" ;
Rīgõ:Rīgõ PROP_SIELDÕ  "Riika" ;
Rīgõ% lop:Rīgõ% lop PROP_TUP  "Riianlahti" ;
Rūʼnõ:Rūʼnõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ  "Ruhnu" ;
Rūoj:Rūoj PROP_KǬJ  "Roja" ;
Sabīl:Sabīl PROP_KULTŪR  "Sabile" ;
Sasmagā:Sasmagā PROP_PADĀ  "Valdemārpils" ;
Siprikšvigā:Siprikš#vigā PROP_TUBĀ  "Siprikšviga-laakso" ;
Stēņḑa:Stēņḑa PROP_ĀITA  "Stende" ;
Šlītõr% mäʼg:Šlītõr% mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Slītere-kukkula" ;
Tartu:Tartu PROP_RADIO  "Tartto" ;
Tiabõrmäʼg:Tiabõr#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Stieberkalns-kukkula" ;
Tirkmǭ:Tirk#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Turkki" ;
Tubāmägūd:Tubā#mäg PROP_NIʼM-PL  "Istabkalni-kukkulat" ;
Ūdmȯizõ:Ūd#mȯizõ PROP_SIELDÕ  "Jaunmuiža" ;
Ukrain:Ukrain PROP_IRM  "Ukraina" ;
Ušīūrga:Ušī#ūrga PROP_ĀITA  "Ušu-puro" ;
Vanārūotš% joʼug:Vanā#rūotš% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Vecroču-joki" ;
Vǟnta:Vǟnta PROP_ĀITA  "Venta-joki" ;
Vēna:Vēna PROP_VĒNA  "Daugava" ;
Zemgal:Zemgal PROP_AMĀT  "Zemgale" ;
Žūokkilā:Žūok#kilā PROP_PADĀ  "Žocene" ;
Kaupo:Kaupo PROP_  "Kaupo" ;
Pritš:Pritš PROP_DUŅTŠ  "Pritš" ;
Didžā:Didžā PROP_DADŽĀ  "Didžā" ;
Katšī:Katšī PROP_TORĪ  "Katšī" ;
Lēna:Lēna PROP_VĒNA  "Lēna" ;
Krim:Krim PROP_KIM  "Krim" ;
Alžīrij:Alžīrij PROP_KǬJ  "Algeria" ;
Mǭgõreirōp:Mǭgõr#eirōp PROP_IRM  "Itä-Eurooppa" ;
Bolīvij:Bolīvij PROP_KǬJ  "Bolivia" ;
Sidāmāfrik:Sidām#āfrik PROP_AMĀT  "Keskinen Afrikka" ;
Lȭinageirōp:Lȭinag#eirōp PROP_IRM  "Etelä-Eurooppa" ;
Lȭinagāfrik:Lȭinag#āfrik PROP_AMĀT  "Etelä-Afrikka" ;
Lȭinagamērik:Lȭinag#amērik PROP_AMĀT  "Etelä-Amerikka" ;
Pūʼojkuʼrmǭ:Pūʼoj#kuʼr#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Pohjois-Kuurinmaa" ;
Lȭinagvidūmǭ:Lȭinag#vidū#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Etelä-Vidzeme" ;
Mǭgõrlețmǭ:Mǭgõr#leț#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Itä-Latvia" ;
Pūʼojsūomõmǭ:Pūʼoj#sūomõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Pohjois-Suomi" ;
Tšetšenij:Tšetšenij PROP_KǬJ  "Tšetšenia" ;
Vāldameʼr:Vālda#meʼr PROP_MEʼR  "Itämeri" ;
Veʼžgõrsaksāmǭ:Veʼžgõr#saksā#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Länsi-Saksa" ;
Koiva:Koiva PROP_KRǬIPA  "Gauja-joki" ;
Kǭla:Kǭla PROP_JǬRA  "Salaspils" ;
Krīʼevõmǭ:Krīʼevõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Venäjä" ;
Tārkilā:Tār#kilā PROP_PADĀ  "Tārgale" ;
Valka:Valka PROP_KRǬIPA  "Valka" ;
Ženēv:Ženēv PROP_IRM  "Geneve" ;
